Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.145

Delegation by parent.

Except as otherwise provided in RCW 11.125.410, a parent of a minor, by a power of attorney, may delegate to another person for a period not exceeding twenty-four months any of the parent's powers regarding care, custody, or property of the minor, other than power to consent to marriage or adoption.

[ 2019 c 437 s 129.]